Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 3 Furnishing of Refrigerator Cars by Railroad Companies

46-9-90.
Duty of railroad companies to furnish refrigerator cars; filing of application for cars by shipper.

It shall be the duty of the railroad companies of this state to furnish any grower of peaches, apples, cantaloupes, watermelons, or other perishable products with suitable icing and refrigerator cars or other suitable cars for the transportation of such products, whenever application is made therefor in writing by the shipper 24 hours in advance of the time such cars are wanted for loading. Such application shall be filed with the nearest agent of the railroad company to the point from which shipment is to be made and shall state the time and place from which shipment is desired.

History.

Ga. L. 1907, p. 84, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 2774; Code 1933, § 18-314.

46-9-91.
Liability of company for failure to furnish cars; written claim for damages by shipper; time of payment by company; liquidated damages.

Whenever any railroad company fails to furnish icing and refrigerator cars as required by Code Section 46-9-90 and the shipper places his product in carload lots or, in cases of less than carload lots, expresses to the agent of the railroad company his willingness to pay charges for carload lots, then such railroad company shall be liable for the market value of such product with interest thereon. The market value shall be determined by the market value of the product less the cost of carriage and the usual expense of selling in the market to which the shipper intended shipping the same, on the day such product would have arrived had the same been carried in the usual course of transportation on schedule time for such freight.

In order to avail himself of the rule of damage expressed in subsection (a) of this Code section, the shipper must notify in writing the agent of the railroad company of the market to which he intended to ship his product. Payment shall be made by the railroad company for such product within 30 days after written claim has been filed with the company therefor.

In the event such railroad company fails to make payment as provided in this Code section or fails to tender the correct amount thereof, it shall be liable for an additional fixed sum of $50.00 for each car as liquidated damages. Such liquidated damages may be recovered in any action brought for the recovery of damages on the main claim, in the event recovery is had thereon.

History.

Ga. L. 1907, p. 84, § 2; Civil Code 1910, § 2775; Code 1933, § 18-315.

46-9-92.
Liability of shipper for failing or refusing to accept cars; liability of shipper for failure or refusal to pay damages upon written demand therefor.

In the event the shipper fails or refuses to accept any suitable cars furnished in a timely manner pursuant to Code Section 46-9-90, he shall be liable to the railroad company for the sum of $10.00 per car and the cost of the first or initial icing in the event the same is iced. If the shipper fails or refuses to pay same within 30 days after written demand therefor, he shall be liable for $20.00 per car, together with the cost of icing.

History.

Ga. L. 1907, p. 84, § 3; Civil Code 1910, § 2776; Code 1933, § 18-316.